Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.150

Confirmation of award.

(1) After an arbitrator gives notice under RCW 26.14.140(1) of an award, including an award corrected under RCW 26.14.160, a party may move the court for an order confirming the award.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the court shall confirm an award under this chapter if:

(a) The parties agree in a record to confirmation; or

(b) The time has expired for making a motion, and no motion is pending, under RCW 26.14.170 or 26.14.180.

(3) If an award determines a child-related dispute, the court shall confirm the award under subsection (2) of this section if the court finds, after a review of the record if necessary, that the award on its face:

(a) Complies with RCW 26.14.140 and law of this state other than this chapter governing a child-related dispute; and

(b) Is in the best interests of the child.

(4) On confirmation, an award under this chapter is enforceable as a judgment.

[ 2023 c 61 s 16.]